South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4638.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 43, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 17 Human Embryos Section 44-43-1710.  (A) A person may not knowingly advertise or offer to purchase or sell, or purchase, sell, or otherwise transfer for valuable consideration, a human embryo created by in vitro fertilization. As used in this section, the term "valuable consideration" does not include the reasonable costs associated with the removal, storage, and transportation of a human embryo. (B) A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction: (1) for a first offense, must be imprisoned not more than fifteen years; (2) for a second offense, must be imprisoned not more than thirty years; (3) for a third or subsequent offense, must be imprisoned not more than forty-five years. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----